Utah statutes.
58-76-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
Each applicant for licensure as a professional geologist shall:
(1)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;
(2)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(3)  be of good moral character;
(4)  provide satisfactory evidence of:
(a)  a bachelors or graduate degree in the geosciences granted through an
institution of higher education that is accredited by a regional or national
accrediting agency with a minimum of 30 semester or 45 quarter hours of course
work in the geosciences; or
(b)  completion of other equivalent educational requirements as determined by
the division in collaboration with the board;
(5)  provide satisfactory evidence of:
(a)  with a bachelors degree, a specific record of five years of active
professional practice in geological work of a character satisfactory to the
division, indicating the applicant is competent to be placed in a responsible
charge of the work;
(b)  with a masters degree, a specific record of three years of active
professional practice in geological work of a character satisfactory to the
division, indicating the applicant is competent to be placed in a responsible
charge of the work; or
(c)  with a doctorate degree, a specific record of one year of active
professional practice in geological work of a character satisfactory to the
division, indicating the applicant is competent to be placed in a responsible
charge of the work; and
(6)  after January 1, 2004, meet the examination requirement established by
rule by the division in collaboration with the board.
